Utah statutes.
35A-8-406.   Misconduct of commissioners -- Removal.

(1) A commissioner of an authority may be removed by the mayor or, in the case of an authority for a county, by the body that appointed the commissioner for inefficiency, neglect of duty, or misconduct in office.

(2)  A commissioner may be removed only after a hearing and after having been given a copy of the charges at least 10 days prior to the hearing and having an opportunity to be heard in person or by counsel.

(3)  If a commissioner is removed, a record of the proceedings, together with the charges and findings, shall be filed in the office of the clerk.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 212, 2012 General Session

